Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 63. Hazardous Painting Certification.

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.010.
Hazardous painting certificate required.

A person may not employ or contract with a professional painter to perform hazardous painting for compensation unless the painter holds a current valid hazardous painting certificate issued by the department. As a condition of employment, an employer may require a professional painter to provide a copy of the certificate. It is a defense to a violation of this subsection by an employer if the employer produces a copy of the painter’s certificate and the employer reasonably believed the certificate was not falsified.

A professional painter may not provide a falsified hazardous painting certificate to an employer or make a false statement to an employer regarding the painter’s certification.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.020.
Issuance of certificate.

An application for issuance of a hazardous painting certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the department. An application for initial issuance of a certificate must include proof that the applicant completed an approved basic hazardous painting certificate program not more than 30 days before the application was received by the department. An application for certificate renewal must include proof that the applicant completed an approved supplemental hazardous painting certificate program not more than 30 days before the date the application was received by the department.

The department shall issue a hazardous painting certificate to an applicant who has completed an application and submitted a certificate fee. A certificate is valid for three years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.030.
Fee.

The commissioner shall establish the triennial fee for a hazardous painting certificate by regulation. The fee must reflect the department’s approximate costs or projected costs for the hazardous painting certification program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.040.
Certificate programs.

The department shall

establish requirements for basic and supplemental hazardous painting certificate programs;

review, and approve or disapprove, programs proposed by contractors, labor organizations, public and private schools, vocational education institutions, and others;

assist persons who propose programs to meet requirements for approval.

A basic hazardous painting certificate program must include instruction and written and practical testing in methods of ventilation, respirator selection, chemical reaction to body tissue, proper use of painting tools, knowledge of relevant health and safety laws and regulations, including relevant portions of state occupational safety and health standards adopted by the department in regulation, and other appropriate subjects. A basic hazardous painting certificate program may not exceed 16 hours of instruction and testing. A supplemental hazardous painting certificate program must include instruction and written and practical testing necessary to ensure that a person who completes the program will be knowledgeable about new developments and changes related to hazardous painting that have occurred since the person completed a basic hazardous painting certificate program.

A hazardous painting certificate program conducted by an employer of a person enrolled in the program may include safety instruction required under AS

18.60.066

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 39, SLA 1988 (CSSB 141 (Fin) am), see 1988 House Journal 3209.

Sec. 18.63.050.
Inspections and citations.

The department shall

inspect job sites to assure that persons performing hazardous painting are certified as required under AS

18.63.010(a)

and are performing the work safely;

issue citations to persons who employ or contract with a professional painter in violation of AS

18.63.010(a)

; and

issue citations to professional painters who violate AS

18.63.010(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.060.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.070.
Penalty.

The department may impose a civil fine of not more than $200 for a first violation, and not more than $1,000 for a subsequent violation, of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For painting certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 9.

Sec. 18.63.100.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“hazardous painting” means the application of a substance containing or combined with a toxic or hazardous substance, as defined in AS

18.60.105

, in vaporized, liquid, or particulate form to create a coating that will adhere to a surface to protect or preserve the surface; “hazardous painting” does not include the application of water-based paint that does not contain emulsion epoxies or isocyanates;

“professional painter” means a painting contractor, an employee of a painting contractor, or a person engaged in the business of painting, but does not include a casual laborer, a commercial artist, or a person who creates artworks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 39, SLA 1988 (CSSB 141 (Fin) am), see 1988 House Journal 3209.